Washington, session 2025-2026, SB5156.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 1. A new section is added to chapter 19.27 RCW to read as follows:The state building code council shall adopt, by rule, for the 2027 technical codes, standards for cities and counties to allow, for apartment buildings with at most six stories and at most 24 units in total, passenger elevators minimally sized to meet federal accessibility requirements.NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 2. A new section is added to chapter 19.27 RCW to read as follows:(1) The state building code council shall convene a technical advisory group to examine requirements for elevator hoistway opening protection and for two-way visual emergency communications devices, and evaluate whether current requirements properly balance cost and safety for small apartment buildings.(2) The technical advisory group convened under this subsection, in addition to the requirements under RCW 19.27.033, must include:(a) At least one position for a representative of the Washington state fire chiefs association;(b) One building code official;(c) One position for a state elevator inspector;(d) One representative from a major elevator manufacturing company;(e) One representative of labor involved in the installation, maintenance, and repair, or any combination thereof, of elevators;(f) One representative of a nonprofit with expertise in elevators that is based in the state of Washington;(g) One representative from a disability rights group;(h) One representative from a senior citizen advocacy group;(i) One developer of small multifamily buildings; and(j) One architect of small multifamily buildings.--- END ---